Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.301

Military affiliate radio system license plates.

"Military affiliate radio system license plates" means special license plates displaying official military affiliate radio system call letters assigned by the United States department of defense.

[ 2010 c 161 s 124.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.